District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.56

Pay for Management Supervisory Service.

A pay schedule shall be developed by the Mayor following a classification and compensation study for the Management Supervisory Service.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 956
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(k), 45 DCR 2464
This section is referenced in § 1-609.03.
1981 Ed., § 1-610.56.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Management Supervisory Service Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-70, October 25, 1999, law notification 47 DCR 2627).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Management Supervisory Service Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-153, October 22, 1999, 46 DCR 8866).
Applicability of § 101(k) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-609.51.